test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-joora_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jǭra: # Noun 44 'eng /est järv/fin' - full paradigm
     jǭra+N+Sg+Nom: jǭra
     jǭra+N+Sg+Gen: jǭra
     jǭra+N+Sg+Par: jarrõ
     jǭra+N+Sg+Dat: jǭran
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ins: jǭraks
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ill: jarrõ
     jǭra+N+Sg+Ela: jǭrast
     jǭra+N+Pl+Nom: jǭrad
     jǭra+N+Pl+Gen: jǭrad
     jǭra+N+Pl+Par: jǭridi
     jǭra+N+Pl+Dat: jǭradõn
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ins: jǭradõks
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ill: jǭriž
     jǭra+N+Pl+Ela: jǭrist
